District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.74

Sales of notes.

All notes issued pursuant to this part may be sold at not less than par and accrued interest at private sale without previous advertising.

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 806, Pub. L. 93-198, title IV, § 474

History

1981 Ed., § 47-330.
1973 Ed., § 47-250.

Prior Codifications